Oklahoma, session 2026, SB88.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 17-106.1, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 17-106.1. A. The Board of Trustees of the Teachers’


Retirement System of Oklahoma shall discharge their duties with


respect to the System solely in the interest of the participants and


beneficiaries and:


1. For the exclusive purpose of:


a. providing benefits to participants and their


beneficiaries, and


b. defraying reasonable expenses of administering the


System;

Req. No. 1050 Page 1

RBS No. 1050

2. With the care, skill, prudence, and diligence under the


circumstances then prevailing that a prudent person acting in a like


capacity and familiar with such matters would use in the conduct of


an enterprise of a like character and with like aims;


3. By diversifying the investments of the System so as to


minimize the risk of large losses, unless under the circumstances it


is clearly prudent not to do so; and


4. In accordance with the laws, documents and instruments


governing the System.


B. The Board of Trustees of the Teachers’ Retirement System of


Oklahoma may invest the assets of the System in real property owned


or to be acquired by the State of Oklahoma state. It is further


authorized to acquire, exchange, and grant any real property under


its jurisdiction as is necessary to carry out the investment in the


real property. The Board of Trustees of the Teachers’ Retirement


System of Oklahoma is authorized to invest not more than ten percent


(10%) of the total value of assets of the System in connection with


such investments. Limitations on investment of the assets of the


System provided herein shall be determined as of the date of its


making or acquisition.


C. The Board of Trustees may procure insurance indemnifying the


members of the Board of Trustees from personal loss or


accountability from liability resulting from a member’s action or


inaction as a member of the Board.

Req. No. 1050 Page 2

RBS No. 1050

D. The Board of Trustees may establish an investment committee.


The investment committee shall be composed of not more than five (5)


members of the Board of Trustees appointed by the chairman chair of


the Board of Trustees. The committee shall make recommendations to


the full Board of Trustees on all matters related to the choice of


custodians and managers of the assets of the System, on the


establishment of investment and fund management guidelines, and in


planning future investment policy. The committee shall have no


authority to act on behalf of the Board of Trustees in any


circumstances whatsoever. No recommendation of the committee shall


have effect as an action of the Board of Trustees nor take effect


without the approval of the Board of Trustees as provided by law.


E. The Board of Trustees may retain qualified investment


managers to provide for the investment of the monies of the System.


The investment managers shall be chosen by a solicitation of


proposals on a competitive bid basis pursuant to standards set by


the Board of Trustees. Subject to the overall investment guidelines


set by the Board of Trustees, the investment managers shall have


full discretion in the management of those monies of the System


allocated to the investment managers. The Board of Trustees shall


manage those monies not specifically allocated to the investment


managers. The monies of the System allocated to the investment


managers shall be actively managed by the investment managers, which


may include selling investments and realizing losses if such action

Req. No. 1050 Page 3

RBS No. 1050

is considered advantageous to longer term return maximization.


Because of the total return objective, no distinction shall be made


for management and performance evaluation purposes between realized


and unrealized capital gains and losses.


F. Funds and revenues for investment by the investment managers


or the Board of Trustees shall be placed with a custodian selected


by the Board of Trustees. The custodian shall be a bank or trust


company offering pension fund master trustee and master custodial


services. The custodian shall be chosen by a solicitation of


proposals on a competitive bid basis pursuant to standards set by


the Board of Trustees. In compliance with the investment policy


guidelines of the Board of Trustees, the custodian bank or trust


company shall be contractually responsible for ensuring that all


monies of the System are invested in income-producing investment


vehicles at all times. If a custodian bank or trust company has not


received direction from the investment managers of the System as to


the investment of the monies of the System in specific investment


vehicles, the custodian bank or trust company shall be contractually


responsible to the Board of Trustees for investing the monies in


appropriately collateralized short-term interest-bearing investment


vehicles.


G. By November 1, 1988, and prior to August 1 of each year


thereafter, the Board of Trustees shall develop a written investment


plan for the System.

Req. No. 1050 Page 4

RBS No. 1050

H. The Board of Trustees shall compile a quarterly financial


report of all the funds of the System on a fiscal year basis. The


report shall be compiled pursuant to uniform reporting standards


prescribed by the Oklahoma State Pension Commission for all state


retirement systems. The report shall include several relevant


measures of investment value, including acquisition cost and current


fair market value with appropriate summaries of total holdings and


returns. The report shall contain combined and individual rate of


returns of the investment managers by category of investment, over


periods of time. The Board of Trustees shall include in the


quarterly reports all commissions, fees or payments for investment


services performed on behalf of the Board. The report shall be


distributed to the Governor, the Oklahoma State Pension Commission,


the Legislative Service Bureau, the Speaker of the House of


Representatives and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate. In


lieu of compiling and distributing the quarterly report, the Board


may provide the Oklahoma State Pension Commission with direct access


to the same data from the custodian bank for the System.


I. After July 1 and before December 1 of each year, the Board


of Trustees shall publish widely an annual report presented in


simple and easily understood language pursuant to uniform reporting


standards prescribed by the Oklahoma State Pension Commission for


all state retirement systems. The report shall be submitted to the


Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the President

Req. No. 1050 Page 5

RBS No. 1050

Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Oklahoma State Pension Commission and


the members of the System. The annual report shall cover the


operation of the System during the past fiscal year, including


income, disbursements, and the financial condition of the System at


the end of the fiscal year. The annual report shall also contain


the information issued in the quarterly reports required pursuant to


subsection H of this section as well as a summary of the results of


the most recent actuarial valuation to include total assets, total


liabilities, unfunded liability or over funded status, contributions


and any other information deemed relevant by the Board of Trustees.


The annual report shall be written in such a manner as to permit a


readily understandable means for analyzing the financial condition


and performance of the System for the fiscal year.


J. 1. The Board of Trustees may approve a two percent (2%)


cost-of-living adjustment, pursuant to the schedule prescribed by


this subsection for persons who have received benefits from the


System for one or more years. The Board of Trustees may only


approve a cost-of-living adjustment when the System’s funded ratio,


according to the latest annual actuarial valuation, exceeds a


percentage as prescribed in paragraph 2 of this subsection;


provided, a cost-of-living adjustment shall not be granted if the


adjustment would cause the funding ratio of the System to drop below


the percentage which authorized the adjustment.



Req. No. 1050 Page 6

RBS No. 1050

2. Except as provided in paragraph 1 of this subsection, a


cost-of-living adjustment may be approved by the Board of Trustees


if the funded ratio of the System exceeds eighty percent (80%).


Subsequent cost-of-living adjustments may be approved each time


thereafter that the System’s funded ratio increases by two and one-


half percent (2 1/2%) from the percentage which authorized the


previous cost-of-living adjustment.




60-1-1050 RD 1/19/2025 5:45:07 AM































Req. No. 1050 Page 7